Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.415.030

In-Service Training Act of 1977—Purpose.

In order to provide for the improvement of the instructional process in the public schools and maintain and improve the skills of public school certificated and classified personnel, there is hereby adopted an act to be known as the "In-Service Training Act of 1977".

[ 1977 ex.s. c 189 s 1. Formerly RCW 28A.71.200.]

NOTES:

Severability—1977 ex.s. c 189: "If any provision of this act, or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act, or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1977 ex.s. c 189 s 4.]